Utah statutes.
73-26-502.   Analysis of benefits and costs -- Allocation of costs.
The division shall:
(1)  identify the uses and calculate the economic benefits and costs of the
developed water; and
(2)  allocate project costs according to the following purposes:
(a)  municipal and industrial;
(b)  agricultural;
(c)  hydropower;
(d)  recreation;
(e)  fish and wildlife; and
(f)  flood control.
